Louisiana, session 2026, HB1158.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 3:3221(B)(3)(f) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§3221. Registration of pesticides
* * *
B. Each application for the initial registration of a pesticide and for the
re-registration of a pesticide for which the label has been changed shall be
accompanied by the following information:
* * *
(3) Two complete copies of the labeling of the pesticide, containing:
* * *
(f) Directions for the use of the pesticide, including warnings or caution
statements. Warnings or caution statements shall not vary in material respects from
the warnings or caution statements on the product label that is registered with the
United States Environmental Protection Agency.
* * *
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-2666 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1158